Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.360

Petition by natural parent to set aside adoption—Costs—Time limit.

(1) If a natural parent unsuccessfully petitions to have an adoption set aside, the court shall award costs, including reasonable attorneys' fees, to the adoptive parent.

(2) If a natural parent successfully petitions to have an adoption set aside, the natural parent shall be liable to the adoptive parent for both the actual expenditures and the value of services rendered by the adoptive parents in caring for the child.

(3) A natural parent who has executed a written consent to adoption shall not bring an action to set aside an adoption more than one year after the date the court approved the written consent.

[ 1984 c 155 s 35.]